Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska27-806
Rule 806. Attacking and supporting credibility of declarant; opportunity to explain; examine declarant.

When a hearsay statement or a statement defined in subdivision (4)(b)(iii), (iv), or (v) of section 27-801 has been admitted in evidence, the credibility of the declarant may be attacked, and if attacked may be supported by any evidence which would be admissible for those purposes if declarant had testified as a witness. Evidence of a statement or conduct by the declarant at any time, inconsistent with his hearsay statement, is not subject to any requirement that he may have been afforded an opportunity to deny or explain. If the party against whom a hearsay statement has been admitted calls the declarant as a witness, the party is entitled to examine him on the statement as if under cross-examination.

Laws 1975, LB 279, § 60.

Under this section, if a hearsay statement is admitted in evidence, a party may discredit the out-of-court declarant by utilizing recognized methods of impeachment. State v. Morrow, 273 Neb. 592, 731 N.W.2d 558 (2007).

Under this section, the declarant of a hearsay statement may be impeached by the introduction of a prior or subsequent statement made by the declarant that is inconsistent with the hearsay statement already admitted at trial. State v. Morrow, 273 Neb. 592, 731 N.W.2d 558 (2007).